Colorado, session 2026A, HB1267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-3-501, amend
(6) as follows:
25.5-3-501. Definitions.
As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6) "Screen" or "screening" means a process identified in rule by
the state department whereby health-care facilities assess a patient's
circumstances related to eligibility criteria and determine whether the
patient is likely to qualify for public health-care coverage HEALTH
INSURANCE PROGRAMS or discounted care, inform the patient of the
health-care facility's determination, and provide information to the patient
about how the patient can enroll in A public health-care coverage HEALTH
INSURANCE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25.5-3-502
as follows:
25.5-3-502. Requirement to screen patients for eligibility for
public health-care programs and discounted care - rules.
(1) Beginning September 1, 2022, A health-care facility shall
screen, unless a patient declines, each uninsured patient for eligibility for:
(a) Public health insurance programs, including, but not limited
to, medicare; the state medical assistance program, articles 4, 5, and 6 of
-2- HB26-1267

this title 25.5; emergency medicaid; and the children's basic health plan,
article 8 of this title 25.5; and
(b) Repealed.
(c) Discounted care, as described in section 25.5-3-503.
(1.5) IF REQUESTED BY AN INSURED PATIENT, A HEALTH-CARE
FACILITY SHALL SCREEN THE PATIENT FOR DISCOUNTED CARE, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25.5-3-503.
(2) Health-care facilities shall use a single uniform application
developed by the state department when screening a patient pursuant to
subsection (1) SUBSECTIONS (1) AND (1.5) of this section.
(3) If a health-care facility determines that a patient is ineligible
for discounted care, the facility shall provide the patient notice of the
determination and an opportunity for the patient to appeal the
determination in accordance with state department rules.
(4) If the patient declines the screening described in subsection (1)
of this section, the health-care facility shall document the patient's
decision in accordance with state department rules. A patient's decision
to decline the screening that is documented and complies with state
department rules is a complete defense to a claim brought by a patient
under PURSUANT TO section 25.5-3-506 (2) for a violation of section
25.5-3-506 (1)(a) or (1)(b) OR (1)(c).
(5) If requested by the patient, a health-care facility shall screen
an insured patient for discounted care pursuant to subsections (1)(b) and
(1)(c) of this section.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-3-503, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(b) as follows:
25.5-3-503. Discounted care for qualified patients - definition.
-3- HB26-1267

(1) Beginning September 1, 2022, If a patient is screened pursuant
to section 25.5-3-502 and is determined to be a qualified patient, a
health-care facility and a licensed health-care professional shall, for
emergency hospital and other health-care services:
(b) Collect amounts charged, not including amounts owed by
third-party payers, in monthly installments such that the patient is not
paying more than:
(I) Four percent of the patient's monthly household income on a
bill from a health-care facility; not paying more than
(II) Two percent of the patient's monthly household income on a
bill from each licensed health-care professional; and not paying more than
(III) Six percent of the patient's household income on a
comprehensive bill containing all health-care facility and licensed
health-care professional charges; and
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-3-504, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(a) as follows:
25.5-3-504. Notification of patients' rights.
(1) Beginning September 1, 2022, A health-care facility shall
make information developed by the state department about patients' rights
under this part 5 PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-3-505 (5)(a) and the uniform
application developed by the state department pursuant to section
25.5-3-505 (2)(i) available to the public and to each patient. At a
minimum, the health-care facility shall:
(a) Post the information in all required languages pursuant to this
subsection (1) IN ALL REQUIRED LANGUAGES conspicuously on the
health-care facility's website, including a link to the information on the
health-care facility's main landing page;
-4- HB26-1267

SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-3-505, amend
(1), (2) introductory portion, (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c) introductory portion,
(2)(c)(I), (2)(e), (2)(g), (2)(h), (3), (4), (5) introductory portion, and (5)(a)
as follows:
25.5-3-505. Reporting requirements - rules.
(1) Beginning September 1, 2023, and each September 1
thereafter, each health-care facility and licensed health-care professional
shall report to the state department data ACROSS RACE, ETHNICITY, AGE,
AND PRIMARY-LANGUAGE-SPOKEN PATIENT GROUPS that the state
department determines is necessary to evaluate compliance across race,
ethnicity, age, and primary-language-spoken patient groups with the
screening, discounted care, payment plan, and collections practices
required pursuant to this part 5. If a health-care facility or licensed
health-care professional is not capable of disaggregating the data required
pursuant to this subsection (1) by race, ethnicity, age, and primary
language spoken, the health-care facility or licensed health-care
professional shall report to the state department the steps the
HEALTH-CARE facility or licensed health-care professional is taking to
improve race, ethnicity, age, and primary-language-spoken data collection
and the date by which the HEALTH-CARE facility or licensed health-care
professional will be able to disaggregate the reported data.
(2) No later than April 1, 2022, The state board shall promulgate
ADOPT rules necessary for the administration and implementation of this
part 5. At a minimum, the rules must:
(a) Outline a process for an insured patient to request a screening
pursuant to section 25.5-3-502 (5) SECTION 25.5-3-502 (1.5);
(b) Outline a process for documenting pursuant to section
-5- HB26-1267

25.5-3-502 (4), that a patient has made an informed decision to decline
the screening PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-3-502 (4), including procedures
for retaining such THE documentation;
(c) Establish the A process for A HEALTH-CARE FACILITY TO, and
ESTABLISH the maximum number of days that a health-care facility has to,
DO THE FOLLOWING:
(I) Initiate a screening after a patient receives HEALTH-CARE
GOODS OR services;
(e) Establish guidelines for A patient appeals regarding TO APPEAL
THE DETERMINATION FOR eligibility for discounted care pursuant to
section 25.5-3-503;
(g) Identify the documents, USING THE MINIMUM AMOUNT OF
INFORMATION NEEDED, that may be required to establish income
eligibility for discounted care; using the minimum amount of information
needed to determine eligibility;
(h) Identify the steps a health-care facility and licensed health-care
professional must take before sending patient A PATIENT'S MEDICAL debt
to collections, INCLUDING COMPLYING WITH THE REQUIREMENTS
DESCRIBED IN PART 2 OF ARTICLE 20 OF TITLE 6;
(3) In promulgating ADOPTING rules pursuant to this section, the
state department shall consider potential limitations relating to the federal
"Emergency Medical Treatment and Labor Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395dd.
(4) Prior to promulgating ADOPTING rules pursuant to this section,
the state department shall hold at least one stakeholder meeting with
hospital representatives, health-care consumers, and health-care consumer
advocates that is accessible to individuals whose primary language is not
English, if requested.
-6- HB26-1267

(5) No later than April 1, 2022, The state department shall:
(a) Using feedback from hospital health-care consumers and
health-care consumer advocate stakeholders ADVOCATES, develop a
written explanation of a patient's rights under PURSUANT TO this section
that is written in plain language at a sixth-grade reading level and
translated into all languages spoken by ten percent or more of the
population in each county of the state and post the written explanation in
all required languages on the state department's website. Each health-care
facility shall make the explanation available to the public and each patient
as provided in section 25.5-3-504.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-3-506, amend
(1) as follows:
25.5-3-506. Limitations on collection actions - private
enforcement.
(1) Beginning September 1, 2022, before assigning, or selling
patient debt, to a collection agency, as defined in section 5-16-103 (3)(a),
or a debt buyer, as defined in section 5-16-103 (8.5) BEFORE ASSIGNING,
SELLING, OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRING MEDICAL DEBT, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 6-20-201, TO A MEDICAL CREDITOR, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
6-20-201, or before pursuing, either directly or indirectly, any permissible
extraordinary collection action, as defined in section 6-20-201 (7)
SECTION 6-20-201:
(a) A health-care facility shall meet the screening requirements in
section 25.5-3-502;
(b) A health-care facility and licensed health-care professional
shall provide discounted care to THE PATIENT IF THE PATIENT IS a
QUALIFIED patient pursuant to section 25.5-3-503, IF APPLICABLE;
-7- HB26-1267

(c) A health-care facility and licensed health-care professional
shall provide a plain language explanation of the health-care services and
fees being billed and notify the patient of potential collection actions
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN PART 2 OF ARTICLE 20 OF
TITLE 6, INCLUDING THE NOTICE REQUIREMENT AND REQUIREMENT TO
OFFER THE PATIENT A REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN, IN RELATION TO THE
MEDICAL DEBT BEING SOLD, ASSIGNED, TRANSFERRED, OR COLLECTED; and
(d) A health-care facility and LICENSED health-care professional
shall bill any third-party payer that is responsible for providing
health-care HEALTH INSURANCE coverage to the patient. If a health-care
professional is an out-of-network provider OUT OF NETWORK under a
qualified patient's health insurance plan, the health-care professional and
health insurance carrier shall comply with the out-of-network billing
requirements described in sections 10-16-704 (3) and 12-30-113.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend part 2 of
article 20 of title 6 as follows:
PART 2
LIMITATIONS ON MEDICAL DEBT COLLECTION
6-20-201. Definitions.
For the purposes of AS USED IN this part 2, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) "Collection activity" means only those activities provided or
performed by a licensed collection agency, using a business name other
than the name of the health-care provider, MEDICAL CREDITOR for
purposes of collecting a MEDICAL debt. The term does not include any
standard billing procedures used by the health-care provider or its agent
in the normal course of business on current, nondelinquent accounts.
-8- HB26-1267

(2) "Collection agency" shall have the same meaning as in section
5-16-103 (3). "HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES" MEANS HEALTH-CARE
GOODS OR HEALTH-CARE SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 10-16-102.
(3) "Health-care provider" includes a health-care facility licensed
pursuant to article 3 of title 25, C.R.S., and any other health-care provider
MEANS A HEALTH-CARE PROFESSIONAL REGISTERED, CERTIFIED, OR
LICENSED PURSUANT TO TITLE 12; A HEALTH-CARE FACILITY, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 25.5-3-501; OR ANY OTHER FACILITY THAT PROVIDES
HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES TO A PATIENT.
(4) "Hospital services" means health-care services, as defined in
section 10-16-102 (33) provided by a health-care facility, as defined in
section 25.5-3-501 (1), or a licensed health-care professional, as defined
in section 25.5-3-501 (3).
(5) (4) "Impermissible extraordinary collection action" means:
(a) Initiating OR THREATENING TO INITIATE foreclosure on, OR
ASSERTING A LIEN ON, ATTACHING, OR SEIZING, OR THREATENING TO
ATTACH OR SEIZE, an individual's primary residence or homestead,
including a mobile home, as defined in section 38-12-201.5 (5) SECTION
38-12-201.5;
(b) INITIATING OR THREATENING TO INITIATE COLLECTION
ACTIVITY AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A PATIENT;
(c) INITIATING OR THREATENING TO INITIATE ATTACHMENT OR
FORECLOSURE ON AN INDIVIDUAL'S TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY;
(d) THREATENING AN INDIVIDUAL WITH DEPORTATION, OR
CONTACTING AUTHORITIES, BASED ON PERCEIVED OR ACTUAL
IMMIGRATION STATUS; WITHHOLDING DOCUMENTS REQUIRED FOR
IMMIGRATION; OR THREATENING TO INTERFERE WITH AN ACTIVE
-9- HB26-1267

IMMIGRATION APPLICATION OR PROCESS;
(e) SEEKING OR SUPPORTING A WARRANT FOR, OR OTHERWISE
PROMOTING, THE ARREST OR DETAINMENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL IN ANY
LEGAL ACTION AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL IN CONNECTION WITH AN ACTION
TO COLLECT OR ATTEMPT TO COLLECT MEDICAL DEBT, INCLUDING ON
MOTIONS RELATED TO DISCOVERY OR CONTEMPT OF COURT;
(f) GARNISHING OR THREATENING TO GARNISH AN INDIVIDUAL'S
WAGES;
(g) ASSERTING A LIEN ON, ATTACHING, OR SEIZING, OR
THREATENING TO ATTACH OR SEIZE, ANY AMOUNTS IN OR INCOME FROM
A RETIREMENT ACCOUNT; A PENSION FUND; AN EDUCATIONAL SAVINGS OR
EXPENSE ACCOUNT; A STOCK BONUS; A PROFIT-SHARING PLAN; ANNUITY
BENEFITS; OR AN ACHIEVING A BETTER LIFE EXPERIENCE SAVINGS
ACCOUNT, CREATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 23-3.1-311, OR A
SIMILAR TYPE OF SAVINGS ACCOUNT FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A
DISABILITY; OR
(h) IN ADDITION TO AMOUNTS EXEMPTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4)(g) OF THIS SECTION, ASSERTING A LIEN ON, ATTACHING,
OR SEIZING, OR THREATENING TO ATTACH OR SEIZE, ANY AMOUNT IN AN
INDIVIDUAL'S ACCOUNT AT A BANK OR OTHER FINANCIAL INSTITUTION,
UNLESS:
(I) THE ACCOUNT BELONGS TO THE PATIENT;
(II) THE LIEN, ATTACHMENT, OR SEIZURE DOES NOT REDUCE THE
OVERALL BALANCE IN THE PATIENT'S ACCOUNTS WITH THE BANK OR OTHER
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION BELOW THIRTY THOUSAND DOLLARS; AND
(III) A JUDGE ISSUES AN ORDER AGAINST A BANK OR OTHER
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT HOLDS A PATIENT'S ACCOUNT INSTRUCTING
-10- HB26-1267

THE BANK OR OTHER FINANCIAL INSTITUTION THAT THE LIEN,
ATTACHMENT, OR SEIZURE APPLIES ONLY TO AN AMOUNT THAT THE
PATIENT HOLDS IN ACCOUNTS WITH THE BANK OR OTHER FINANCIAL
INSTITUTION THAT EXCEEDS THIRTY THOUSAND DOLLARS; EXCEPT THAT
THIS SUBSECTION (4)(g)(III) DOES NOT APPLY IF THE JUDGMENT CREDITOR
ESTABLISHES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF EVIDENCE THAT THE PATIENT HAS
ALREADY CLAIMED THE EXEMPTION FOR ACCOUNTS WITH A DIFFERENT
INSTITUTION FOR THE DEBT.
(6) (5) "Medical creditor" means AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT
CLAIMS ENTITLEMENT TO PAYMENTS ON A MEDICAL DEBT. an entity that
attempts to collect on a medical debt, including:
(a) A health-care provider or health-care provider's billing office;
(b) A collection agency, as defined in section 5-16-103 (3);
(c) A debt buyer, as defined in section 5-16-103 (8.5); and
(d) A debt collector, as defined in 15 U.S.C. sec. 1692a (6).
(6) "MEDICAL DEBT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
5-18-103.
(7) "PATIENT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES
HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES OR THE LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR
WHO RECEIVES HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES.
(7) (8) "Permissible extraordinary collection action" means an
action other than an impermissible extraordinary collection action that
requires a legal or judicial process including but not limited to placing a
lien on an individual's real property, attaching or seizing an individual's
bank account or any other personal property, or garnishing an individual's
wages TO COLLECT MEDICAL DEBT FROM A PATIENT. A permissible
extraordinary collection action does not include the assertion of a hospital
-11- HB26-1267

lien pursuant to section 38-27-101.
6-20-202. Notice to patient of debt.
(1) (a) When a person has health benefit coverage to provide
payment for care or treatment rendered by a health-care provider and the
person has notified the health-care provider of coverage within thirty days
after the date the care or treatment was rendered, and if the health
coverage plan, as defined in section 10-16-102 (34), C.R.S., pays only a
portion of the debt, prior to the assignment of the debt to a licensed
collection agency, the health-care provider shall mail written notice to the
last-known address of the person responsible for payment of the debt at
least thirty days before any collection activity on any amount due and
owing the health-care provider.
(b) The notice required of health-care providers by paragraph (a)
of this subsection (1) shall include the amount due and owing; the name,
address, and telephone number of the health-care provider; where
payment may be made; the date of service; and the last date or number of
days after the date of the notice the health-care provider will accept
payment prior to the debt being submitted to a collection agency or
reporting adverse information to a consumer reporting agency for the debt
for which notice was provided.
(2) (a) If the health-care provider fails to provide the person with
notice of such debt and all other information required by subsection (1)
of this section, the health-care provider shall not pursue any rights to
collect such outstanding amount either through a collection agency or by
any further efforts of the health-care provider to collect the debt. In
addition, the health-care provider may not report adverse information to
a consumer reporting agency for the debt for which notice was provided
-12- HB26-1267

without providing notice to the person pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. The health-care provider shall assist the person in correcting any
adverse credit information because of the health-care provider's failure to
provide notice pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary,
a health-care provider may remedy a failure to give notice by providing
a written report to the collection agency to withhold any collection
activity and withholding any of the health-care provider's own collection
efforts until the provider complies with the notice and time requirements
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(c) Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to require a
health-care provider to perform additional attempts to notify a person of
the person's portion of the debt other than mailing the notice required
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the person's last-known
address and maintaining a record of such mailing.
(d) The failure of a health-care provider or its agent to provide the
notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall not create a cause
of action or remedy against a collection agency under the "Colorado Fair
Debt Collection Practices Act", article 16 of title 5.
6-20-203. Limitations on collection actions - notice
requirement - definition.
(1) Beginning June 1, 2022, A MEDICAL CREDITOR COLLECTING ON
A MEDICAL DEBT FOR HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES SHALL NOT
ENGAGE IN impermissible extraordinary collection actions. may not be
used by any medical creditor to collect debts owed for hospital services.
(2) Beginning June 1, 2022, no medical creditor collecting on a
debt for hospital services shall engage in any permissible extraordinary
-13- HB26-1267

collection actions until one hundred eighty-two days after the date the
patient receives hospital services.
(3) (a) (2) (a) Beginning September 1, 2022, At least thirty days
before SELLING, ASSIGNING, OR OTHERWISE TRANSFERRING A MEDICAL
DEBT, OR taking any permissible extraordinary collection action, a
medical creditor as defined in section 6-20-201 (6)(a), collecting on a
debt for hospital services shall notify VERIFY THE PATIENT HAS BEEN
SCREENED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25.5-3-502 (1) AND (1.5); IF THE
PATIENT IS INSURED, INFORM THE PATIENT OF THE PATIENT'S RIGHT TO
REQUEST A SCREENING PURSUANT TO SECTION 25.5-3-502 (1.5); PROVIDE
the patient WITH A PLAIN LANGUAGE EXPLANATION OF THE MEDICAL DEBT;
AND NOTIFY THE PATIENT of potential collection actions and shall include
with the notice a statement developed by the department of health care
policy and financing that explains the availability of discounted care for
qualified individuals and how to apply for such care BY AT LEAST TWO
MEANS OF COMMUNICATION, INCLUDING THE PATIENT'S PREFERRED
METHOD OF COMMUNICATION, IF KNOWN.
(b) THE NOTICE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF
THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE PATIENT'S NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION;
(II) INFORMATION ABOUT THE SCREENING REQUIREMENTS AND THE
AVAILABILITY OF DISCOUNTED CARE, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
25.5-3-502 AND 25.5-3-503;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF EACH HEALTH-CARE GOOD OR SERVICE
PROVIDED TO THE PATIENT, INCLUDING THE DATE EACH HEALTH-CARE
GOOD OR SERVICE WAS PROVIDED TO THE PATIENT AND THE AMOUNT
CHARGED FOR EACH HEALTH-CARE GOOD OR SERVICE;
-14- HB26-1267

(IV) THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER THAT PROVIDED EACH HEALTH-CARE GOOD OR
SERVICE TO THE PATIENT;
(V) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF ALL REDUCTIONS, ADJUSTMENTS,
OFFSETS, AND PAYMENTS BY THIRD-PARTY PAYERS THAT ADJUST THE
INITIAL CHARGES FOR THE HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES, INCLUDING
PAYMENTS RECEIVED FROM THE PATIENT;
(VI) THE NAME OF THE THIRD-PARTY PAYERS TO WHOM THE
INITIAL CHARGES FOR HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES WERE
SUBMITTED;
(VII) INFORMATION ABOUT THE POTENTIAL AVAILABILITY OF
RETROACTIVE COVERAGE IF THE PATIENT ENROLLED IN THE STATE
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, ARTICLES 4, 5, AND 6 OF TITLE 25.5,
AFTER RECEIVING THE HEALTH-CARE GOODS OR SERVICES;
(VIII) AN ITEMIZATION OF ANY INTEREST THAT HAS ACCRUED ON
THE MEDICAL DEBT AND ANY OTHER ADDITIONAL FEES OR COSTS BEING
CHARGED IN ASSOCIATION WITH THE MEDICAL DEBT, INCLUDING ANY
ATTORNEY FEES;
(IX) THE FINAL AMOUNT THE PATIENT IS LIABLE TO PAY, WHICH
MUST BE PROMINENTLY DISPLAYED, AFTER TAKING INTO ACCOUNT ALL
APPLICABLE REDUCTIONS;
(X) A PLAIN LANGUAGE EXPLANATION OF THE POTENTIAL
CONSEQUENCES OF DEFAULT; AND
(XI) A CLEAR DESCRIPTION OF THE METHODS BY WHICH PAYMENT
FOR THE MEDICAL DEBT CAN BE MADE, INCLUDING AN OFFER TO ENTER
INTO A REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION 6-20-204 AND
HOW TO ACCEPT THE OFFER. AT LEAST ONE OF THE METHODS FOR
-15- HB26-1267

PAYMENT MUST NOT INCLUDE ANY SERVICE CHARGE OR ADDITIONAL FEES.
(b) (I) A medical creditor as defined in section 6-20-201 (6)(b),
(6)(c), or (6)(d), collecting on a debt for hospital services shall include the
following statement in the notices the medical creditor provides to the
patient pursuant to section 5-16-109 (1) and 15 U.S.C. sec. 1692g (a):
"Pursuant to Colorado law, discounts for hospital services are available
for qualified individuals." The statement must include a link to the written
explanation of the patient's rights that is posted to the department of
health care policy and financing's website pursuant to section 25.5-3-505
(5)(a).
(II) (c) A medical creditor as defined section 6-20-201 (6)(b),
(6)(c), or (6)(d), shall not take any permissible extraordinary collection
actions until the later of thirty days from the date of sending the notice
required pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section or the completion
of the validation requirements described in section 5-16-109 (2) and 15
U.S.C. sec. 1692g (b) UNLESS:
(I) THE MEDICAL CREDITOR DEMONSTRATES COMPLIANCE WITH
THE NOTICE REQUIREMENT IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING THE DATE AND MANNER BY WHICH THE NOTICE WAS SENT TO
THE PATIENT;
(II) LESS THAN THREE YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE PATIENT
INCURRED THE MEDICAL DEBT; AND
(III) THE MEDICAL CREDITOR DID NOT KNOW AND SHOULD NOT
HAVE KNOWN ABOUT AN INTERNAL REVIEW, EXTERNAL REVIEW, OR OTHER
APPEAL OF A HEALTH INSURANCE DECISION THAT IS PENDING OR WAS
PENDING WITHIN THE PREVIOUS SIXTY-THREE DAYS.
(3) A MEDICAL CREDITOR MAY REQUEST PAYMENT OF MEDICAL
-16- HB26-1267

DEBT ONLY IF THE MEDICAL CREDITOR:
(a) (I) VERIFIED THE PATIENT, IF THE PATIENT IS UNINSURED, HAS
BEEN SCREENED FOR PUBLIC HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAMS AND
DISCOUNTED CARE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25.5-3-502 AND IS NOT
A QUALIFIED PATIENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25.5-3-501; OR
(II) VERIFIED THE PATIENT, IF THE PATIENT IS INSURED, HAS BEEN
NOTIFIED OF THE PATIENT'S RIGHT TO BE SCREENED FOR DISCOUNTED CARE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 25.5-3-502 (1.5); AND
(b) OFFERED THE PATIENT A REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN
PURSUANT TO SECTION 6-20-204; AND
(c) GAVE THE PATIENT THIRTY DAYS TO RESPOND TO THE OFFER TO
ENTER INTO A REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2022, If a medical creditor collecting
on a debt for hospital services bills or initiates collection activities and it
is later determined that the patient should have been screened pursuant to
section 25.5-3-503 SECTION 25.5-3-502 and is determined to be a
qualified patient, as defined in section 25.5-3-501 (5) SECTION
25.5-3-501, or it is determined that the patient's bill is eligible for
reimbursement through a public health-care coverage HEALTH INSURANCE
program, the medical creditor shall:
(a) Delete any negative reports to consumer reporting agencies;
(b) (I) Unless prohibited by law, if the court has entered a
judgment on the medical debt:
(A) Request the court vacate the judgment in any collection
lawsuit over the medical debt and enter into a payment plan with the
patient that meets the requirements of section 25.5-3-503 (1)(b); or
(B) Request the court reduce the amount of the judgment,
-17- HB26-1267

including any fees and costs related to the collection lawsuit, to the total
amount the patient owes pursuant to the public health-care coverage
HEALTH INSURANCE program or discounted care policy that the patient
qualifies for, enter into a payment plan with the patient that meets the
requirements of section 25.5-3-503 (1)(b), and suspend all execution on
the judgment while the patient is compliant with the terms of the payment
plan; or
(C) File a satisfaction of judgment such that the remaining unpaid
balance of the judgment, including any fees and costs related to the
collection lawsuit, is equal to the total amount the patient owes under the
public health-care coverage HEALTH INSURANCE program or discounted
care policy that the patient qualifies for, enter into a payment plan with
the patient that meets the requirements of section 25.5-3-503 (1)(b), and
suspend all execution on the judgment while the patient is compliant with
the terms of the payment plan.
(II) For the purposes of subsections (4)(b)(I)(B) and (4)(b)(I)(C)
SUBSECTIONS (3)(b)(I)(B) AND (3)(b)(I)(C) of this section, the court shall
refund to the parties any fees and costs paid to the court in connection
with the litigation of the medical debt and the health-care provider shall
indemnify the medical creditor for any fees awarded as part of the
judgment in connection with the medical debt.
(c) As the term "medical creditor" is defined in section 6-20-201
(6)(a), Refund any excess amount to the patient if the patient has paid any
part of the medical debt or if any of the patient's money has been seized
or levied in excess of the amount that the patient owes after application
of required discounts;
(d) As the term "medical creditor" is defined in sections 6-20-201
-18- HB26-1267

(6)(b), (6)(c), and (6)(d), If the patient has paid any part of the medical
debt or if any of the patient's money has been seized or levied in excess
of the amount that the patient owes after application of required
discounts, refund any excess amount to the patient to the extent the
medical creditor has not already remitted such an THE amount to the
health-care provider; and
(e) Remedy any other permissible extraordinary collection action.
(5) Beginning September 1, 2022, A medical creditor collecting
on a debt for hospital services shall not sell, ASSIGN, OR TRANSFER a
medical debt to another A THIRD party unless, prior to the sale,
ASSIGNMENT, OR TRANSFER, the medical debt seller CREDITOR INITIATING
THE SALE, ASSIGNMENT, OR TRANSFER has entered into a legally binding
written agreement with the medical debt buyer of the debt pursuant to
which:
(a) The medical debt buyer agrees not to pursue impermissible
extraordinary collection actions to obtain payment for the care;
(b) The MEDICAL debt is returnable to or recallable by the medical
debt seller CREDITOR INITIATING THE SALE, ASSIGNMENT, OR TRANSFER,
upon a determination that the patient should have been screened pursuant
to section 25.5-3-502 and is eligible for discounted care pursuant to
section 25.5-3-503 or that the bill underlying the medical debt is eligible
for reimbursement through a public health-care coverage HEALTH
INSURANCE program; and
(c) If it is determined that the patient should have been screened
pursuant to section 25.5-3-502 and is eligible for discounted care pursuant
to section 25.5-3-503 or that the bill underlying the medical debt is
eligible for reimbursement through a public health-care coverage HEALTH
-19- HB26-1267

INSURANCE program and the MEDICAL debt is not returned to or recalled
by the medical debt seller CREDITOR INITIATING THE SALE, ASSIGNMENT,
OR TRANSFER, the medical debt buyer shall adhere to procedures that must
be specified in the agreement that ensures the patient will not pay, and has
no obligation to pay, the medical debt buyer and the medical creditor
together more than the patient is personally responsible for paying.
(6) The medical debt seller shall indemnify the medical debt buyer
for any amount paid for a debt that is returned to or recalled by the
medical debt seller.
(7) Nothing in this section limits or affects THIS SECTION DOES
NOT LIMIT OR AFFECT a health-care provider's right to pursue against any
party other than the patient the collection of personal injury, liability,
uninsured, underinsured, medical payment rehabilitation, disability,
homeowner's, business owner's, workers' compensation, fault-based
insurance, subrogated claims, or other claims not against the patient, AS
LONG AS THE COLLECTION ACTIONS TAKEN ARE NOT IMPERMISSIBLE
EXTRAORDINARY COLLECTION ACTIONS.
(8) ANY SALE, ASSIGNMENT, TRANSFER, OR COLLECTION
ACTIVITIES THAT DO NOT COMPLY WITH THIS PART 2 ARE VOID OR
DISMISSED, AND THE MEDICAL CREDITOR INITIATING THE SALE,
ASSIGNMENT, TRANSFER, OR COLLECTION ACTIVITIES IS LIABLE TO THE
PATIENT FOR THREE THOUSAND DOLLARS OR ANY ACTUAL DAMAGES
SUSTAINED AS A RESULT OF NONCOMPLIANCE, WHICHEVER IS GREATER,
AND ANY ATTORNEY FEES OR COSTS INCURRED BY THE PATIENT.
(9) A PATIENT'S FULL OR PARTIAL PAYMENT OF A MEDICAL DEBT
OR ACCEPTANCE OF A REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION
6-20-204 DOES NOT CONSTITUTE ADMISSION THAT THE MEDICAL DEBT IS
-20- HB26-1267

VALID. A PATIENT WHO MAKES A PAYMENT ON A MEDICAL DEBT OR
ACCEPTS A REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN RETAINS ANY LEGAL DEFENSES
THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE AVAILABLE IN A COLLECTION ACTION.
(10) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT ANY OTHER LEGAL OR
EQUITABLE REMEDIES AVAILABLE TO THE PATIENT.
6-20-204. Reasonable payment plan - conditions to require full
payment of balance of medical debt.
(1) (a) A MEDICAL CREDITOR SHALL OFFER A REASONABLE
PAYMENT PLAN TO EACH PATIENT WITH MEDICAL DEBT. AT A MINIMUM,
THE REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN MUST:
(I) BE PAYABLE IN INSTALLMENTS SUCH THAT THE PATIENT IS NOT
PAYING MORE THAN FOUR PERCENT OF THE PATIENT'S WEEKLY NET
INCOME TOWARD MEDICAL DEBT;
(II) PROMINENTLY DISCLOSE THE DATE BY WHICH THE MEDICAL
DEBT WILL BE PAID IN FULL IF PAYMENTS SET BY THE SCHEDULE IN THE
PAYMENT PLAN ARE MADE WITHOUT DELAY OR INTERRUPTION;
(III) INCLUDE A PROVISION FOR ADJUSTING THE INSTALLMENT
AMOUNTS AND DURATION TO ACCOUNT FOR SIGNIFICANT CHANGES IN THE
PATIENT'S FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES; AND
(IV) PROVIDE A SIXTY-DAY GRACE PERIOD FOR ANY LATE
PAYMENT.
(b) THE MEDICAL CREDITOR SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN COPY OF
THE REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN TO THE PATIENT NO LATER THAN SEVEN
DAYS AFTER ENTERING INTO THE PAYMENT PLAN.
(c) A REASONABLE PAYMENT PLAN MUST NOT INCLUDE A
REQUIREMENT TO PAY PRE-JUDGMENT INTEREST.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 5-16-103, amend
-21- HB26-1267

(3)(d) as follows:
5-16-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 16, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) (d) (I) For the purposes of section 5-16-108 (1)(f), "collection
agency" includes any person engaged in any business the principal
purpose of which is the enforcement of security interests. For purposes of
sections 5-16-104, 5-16-105, 5-16-106, 5-16-107, 5-16-108, and 5-16-109
only, "collection agency" includes a debt collector for the department of
personnel.
(II) FOR THE PURPOSES OF SECTIONS 5-16-108 (1)(l) AND 5-16-113,
"COLLECTION AGENCY" INCLUDES A MEDICAL CREDITOR, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 6-20-201.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 5-16-108, amend
(1)(l) as follows:
5-16-108. Unfair practices.
(1) A debt collector or collection agency shall not use unfair or
unconscionable means to collect or attempt to collect any debt, including,
but not limited to, the following conduct:
(l) An attempt to collect a debt that violates the provisions of
section 6-20-203 (1), (2), (3)(b), (4)(a), (4)(b)(I), (4)(d), (4)(e), or (5)(a)
to (5)(c) SECTION 6-20-203.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 5-16-111, amend
(1.5)(a) as follows:
5-16-111. Legal actions by collection agencies.
(1.5) A debt collector, or collection agency that is not a creditor
or debt buyer, shall not be the named plaintiff in a legal action or take any
legal action on a debt against a consumer unless the debt collector or
-22- HB26-1267

collection agency:
(a) Ensures that the name of the original creditor or assignor and
the name of the debt collector or collection agency are included in the
case caption of the complaint, in that order. and IF THERE ARE MULTIPLE
ORIGINAL CREDITORS OR ASSIGNORS, EACH ORIGINAL CREDITOR OR
ASSIGNOR MUST BE LISTED IN THE CASE CAPTION AS A SEPARATE PLAINTIFF
AND THEIR INCLUSION IN THE ACTION MUST COMPLY WITH THE RULES OF
PERMISSIVE JOINDER PURSUANT TO COLORADO RULES OF CIVIL
PROCEDURE. JOINDER OF ACTIONS SUA SPONTE BY A COURT DOES NOT
VIOLATE THIS SUBSECTION (1.5).
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-80-101, add
(1)(q) as follows:
13-80-101. General limitation of actions - three years.
(1) The following civil actions, regardless of the theory upon
which suit is brought, or against whom suit is brought, shall be
commenced within three years after the cause of action accrues, and not
thereafter:
(q) PERMISSIBLE EXTRAORDINARY COLLECTION ACTIONS FOR THE
COLLECTION OF MEDICAL DEBT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6-20-201;
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-80-103.5,
amend (1)(a) as follows:
13-80-103.5. General limitation of actions - six years.
(1) The following actions shall be commenced within six years
after the cause of action accrues and not thereafter:
(a) All actions to recover a liquidated debt or an unliquidated,
determinable amount of money due to the person bringing the action, all
actions for the enforcement of rights set forth in any instrument securing
-23- HB26-1267

the payment of or evidencing any debt, and all actions of replevin to
recover the possession of personal property encumbered under any
instrument securing any debt; except that:
(I) Actions to recover MADE pursuant to section 38-35-124.5 (3)
C.R.S., shall be commenced within one year; AND
(II) PERMISSIBLE EXTRAORDINARY COLLECTION ACTIONS
INVOLVING MEDICAL DEBT PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF ARTICLE 20 OF TITLE
6 ARE GOVERNED BY THE LIMITATION DESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-80-101
(1)(q).
SECTION 13. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-24- HB26-1267